Washington statutes.
RCW 18.79.210

License renewal—Procedures, requirements, fees.

A license issued under this chapter must be renewed, except as provided in this chapter. The licensee shall comply with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees as determined under RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

[ 1996 c 191 s 63; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 421.]